2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-cs.pat.txt
oz3t
o3zu
o4zut
oz3vr
oz3v??
o3z??
o3z??
oz??4s
o1??
o??2k
o??4ka
o2??
o3??a
o3??o
o1??
o??i2s
o3??k
o4??ku
o4??ky
o3??l
o??4l??
o??4mo
o??4ti
o??4??u
o3??l
o??4mo
1p
2p.
pa4ed
pa4es
pa4kl
pa3si
pa4t.
pat4ri
2p1c
pe4al
pede4
pe4ig
pe4np
peri3
pes3t3
pe4tra
3pe??
pi4kr
pi4pl
2pk
p2kl
p2l
3pl.
4p3la.
pl3h
pl4h.
4p3li.
4plo.
2pn
p2nu
po1b2
po3c2
3pod
podb??4h
pod4nes
po3dru
po3dr??
po3h
poly3
po3m2
po4mp
po4ol
po3p
po4p.
po4pm
po1s2
pos4p
post4r
po3t2
po4t.
po4tn
po3uk
po3u??
po3u??
3po3v
po3z2
po4zd
po??2
po3??k
po??3te
po3????
po4??v
2pp
4pra.
pra3st
pr2c
pro1
prob2
pro3p
pro3t4
pro3z
pr2s
4pr??n
pr??3
pse4s
2p1sk
p4sut
2pt
p4tej
p4ter
p4tev
pt4ri
p3tu
p4t??.
pu4dl
pu4tr
pyt3l
p??1
p??2c
p??d3l
p??4nv
p??4sl
2p??
p??4rh
2p??.
p??e3h
p??e3j
p??e3t4
p??e3z
p??e3??2
p??i3
p??ih4
2p??
p??4ti
2p??
qu2
2r.
1ra.
ra4br
ra4em
ra4es
ra4ff
ra4hl
ra4hm
ra4jg
ra4j??
2rak
ra4nh
ra3si
rast4r
ra4vv
ra4wl
ra4y.
ra4yo
ra4??m
4ra??i
r1b
r2bl
r1c
rca3
r3cha
r3cho
rc4ki
r1d
r4dla
rdo2s
re4ad
re4au
red4r
re4et
re3kl
re3kvi
re4mr
re2sb
res3l
retis4
ret4r
re4um
r1ha
r3hl.
rh3n
r1ho
r3hu
r1h??
ri4bb
1ric
ric4ku
ri4dg
ri4dr
ri4fl
ri4gh
ri4zm
2rk
r2kl
r1l
2r1m
r4mio
2rn
rna4v??
rn4dr
ro4ad
ro3by
rod2l
ro3d4r
3rofy
ro3h
ro4h.
ro4jb
ro4k??
rom3n
romy4s
rop??t4
ro2sb
ro4skv
ro4sky
ro3sv
ro3ti
ro3tl
ro4t??
ro3vd
rov??4t
3rov??
roz3d
roz3n
ro4zo
roz3v
ro3z??
ro4??p
rpa3d
2rr
rr4ha
rr4ho
2r1s
r2st
r4stu
rs3tv??
rs3tv??
2r1t
r2th
r4tr??
rt4sm
rtu3
r2t3v
rt4zu
1ru.
ru3se
ru3si
rus3k
ru3??i
3rvan??
r1x
1ry.
rych3
ryd2
rys3ky
rys3t
ry4zk
ry4zn
ry4??.
ry4??k
2rz
rz3d
rz3l
r??d4l
r??4d??
1r??k
r??3ri
1r????
r1??
4r??it??.
r??3t
3r??.
2r??
2r??
r??4n??
r??4m.
r??s3ta
r??4v.
3r??.
r??4zn
2s.
sa4pf
sa4pr
sas3k
s2b2
s2c
s3ca
s3ce.
sch2
sch4l
sch4n
3schop
s3ci
sci4e
s3c??
s2d
1se
se4au
se3h
se4ig
se4il
sej4m
se4ku
3sel
se3lh
3sem
ser4va
se3s2
ses4k
se4ss
se4stra
se4stru
se4st??
set2
se3tk
se3t??
se4ur
se3z
se3??t
2sf
s3fo
3sf??
s3f??
1si
3sic
3sif
si4fl
sig4no
3sik
si3ste
3sit
s2j
s3ju
s2k
4skac
s4kak
4skam
s4kok
2skon
skos4
4skot
sk4ra
sk4ru
sk4ry
4skve
sk4vo
s3k??n
s3k??
3sl.
4s3la.
s4lav
s3le.
s4led
s3lem
s3len
s3let
s4lib
s4li??i
3sln
4s3lo.
s2ly
s3ly.
s1l??
s2ma
s4mek
s2mo
2sn
s2na
s3nat
s2ne
s3ne.
sn4tl
s2n??
s3n??.
s4n??d
1so
sob4l
so3br
so4sk
so4tv
sou3h
sou3s
souz4
so4??k
s2p
s4pol
spro4s
1sr
2ss
ss4sr
2st.
4sta.
s3taj
s2tan
st4at
4stec
s4tep
st4er
s4tero
s4tich
2stil
s4tink
4stit.
4sti??
st3lo
2stn
4sto.
s4tona
4stou.
4str.
4stram
s4trik
4strn
4str??c
4stupni
s2tv
st4ve
3stv??
4sty.
s4tyl
3sty??
s2t??
4st??.
s3t????
4st??.
s4t??d
3st??h
s2t??r
s2t????
s1t??
2st??.
s3t??ej
1su
su4ba
su4bo
suma4
su3ve
s2v
sy3c
sych3r
sy4nes
s??2d
3s??h
s??2kl
2s2??
s3??i
1s??
1s??
2s??
2s??
s3??o
1s??
s2??
2t.
1ta.
ta2bl
tac4tvo
t2a3d
1taj
ta4jf
ta4jg
4talt
4tand
3tan??
t1ao
2tark
tast4
ta3str
ta4??k
2t1b
2t1c
1te
3te.
te4ak
te4fl
te4in
4ten??m
teob4
tep3l
ters4
tes3ta
te4tr
te4uc
te4ur
te4ut
2tf
2tg
1ti
ti4gr
2tih
ti3kl
tin4g
ti4pl
ti3sl
tis4tr
ti4tr
2titu
tiz4r
4tiz??
ti??3
2ti??
2tk2
t4kal
4t2kan
t4kat
t2kl
tk4la
tk4li
4tkn??
t2k??
2tl
3tl.
4tla.
t1le
tles3
3tlm
t3lo.
t4lou
tlu3
tlu4s
t1ly
t1l??
2tm
t2ma
2tn
t3n??
1to
to4as
to3b
tob4l
to3dr
to4hm
to4ir
2toj
tol4s
to4ol
4top.
4topt
4topu
2torn
2toup
2tp
t3rant
t4rea
t4ref
tre4t
4tric.
trip4
t4rit
t4rog
t3rol
tro4sk
t4rou
4trouh
4tro??.
4trun
t4rus
4t4ru??
t3r??ln
4tr????
2tr??
t3r??m
t3r??v
2tr??
2t1s
ts4ko
ts2t
2t1t
tt4ch
tt4ri
1tu.
tu4ff
1tuj
tu4lk
2tup
tu4r.
tu3ry
tu4s.
tu4??.
tu3??i
t2v
2tve
2t3vi
t4vinn
t4vi??
t4v??c
1ty.
ty4g??
ty2la
ty4??e
ty4??h
ty4??j
ty4??o
ty4??r
ty4????
3t??.
t??4fl
t2??
t3??i
2t????
1t??
t??2bl
3t??m
1t??
t??3d4l
2t??h
2t??nn
2t??p
1t??c
4t??c.
4t??ce
1t??m
2t??n
2t??r
2t??
t4??eb
t??eh3n
t2??el
t2??ic
t3??il
t??4ti
t1??u
t2????
3t????b
t????4s
2t??
t3??t
t??4ti
1t??
1t??.
1t??m
1t????
3t????
u1
2u.
u2at
u2b
u3ba
u3be
u3bi
u3bo
ubs4t
u3bu
u3b??
u3b??.
u3b??
uc4t??
2u2d
u3de
u3di
u3do
u3dru
u3du
u3dy
u3d??
ue4fa
2uf
u2hl
uh3l??
uh3no
u2in
u2jm
u2k
u3ka.
uk4aj
uk4al
uk4at
u3ke
uk3la
uk3le
u3ko
u3ku
u3ky
uk4??.
u3k??
ul4fa
ul1h
ul4p??
u2m
u3ma
u3me
u3mi
um4pl
um4ru
u3mu
u3m??
3um??
u2n
un4dl
u3ne
u3no
u3nu
u3n??
u3n??
u3n??
un4??r
u2p
u3pa
u3pe
upe2r3
u3pi
u3pln
u3pu
u3py
u3p??
u3p??
u3p??
u3p??
u2r
u3ra
u3re
u3ri
2u3ro
u3ru
u3ry.
u3r??
1ur??
u3r??
u2s
us3ky
us3k??
us3k??
us3k??
us1l
us2lo
u3so
u4ste
u4sty
u4st??
u4st??
u3st??
u4st??
u4st??
u3su.
u3sy
u3s??
u3s??
u3s??
u4tro
u4tr??
u2v
u3vi
u3vu
u2z
u3ze
u3zi
uz1l
u3zo
u3zu
u3z??
u2??
u3??a
u3??e
u3??i
u3??o
u??3t
u3??u
u3????
u3????
u2??
u2??
u2??
u3??e
u3??i
u??4kl
u3??o
u??3t??
u3??u
u3????
u3????
u2??
u3??e
u3??o
u3??u
u3????
u3????
1v
2v.
va3dl
va4j??
va4kl
2v1b
2v1c
v2ch
2v2d
v4dal
v3di
v4d??k
v4d????
ve3dle
ve3jd
3ven
ve2p
ve3ps
vep3??
ves3l
ve4sm
ves4p
ve3sta
ve3t4??
ve2z3m
vi4ch
vide2
vi4dr
vi4et
vi4kr
vi2tr
2vk
v2kr
v2l
2v3la.
4vle.
4vlem
2vlo
2vm
2vn
v4nad
vo3b
vo4ic
vo4ja
vo4jb
vo4jd
vo4jj
vo4jm
vo4j??
vo2s
vo4t??
vou3
vous2
v2p
vr2c
vr2dl
4vrny
v1ro
vr4st
vrst3v
vrs4tv??
2vs2
v1sk
v3stv
2v2t
vy3c
vy3d2
vy4dra
vyp2
vy3s2
vy4sn
vys4t
vy3t
vy3??
vy??4k
vy??2
vy4??.
vy4??m
vy4????
vy4??l
v2z2
vz4no
vz4n??
vz4n??
vz4n??
v??3ri
2v2??
v3????
v3????
v4????r
v??4cm
v??3t4a
v??ce3
v??4hat
3v??n
2v??
2v????
v3????n
v2??2
v??e3s
v3??t??.
3v??s
v??3t
3v??3z
v2??2
wa4fd
3war
wa4re
we2
2x.
xand4
2xf
xisk4
2xn
3xov
x1t
xt4ra
xy4sm
y1
y2a
y2bl
yb3ri
y2ch
y4chr
y2d1l
yd4l??
y2dr
yd4y.
y2e
y2gr
y3hn
yh4ne
yj4ma
yj4me
y2kl
yk3la
y3klop
yk4ly
yman??4
ym4kl
yna4s
y3ni
ype4r
yp4si
yp4t??
y2p??
yr2v
y2s
y3sa
y3se
y3si
ys3lu
y3sm
y3so
y3sp
ys2t
ys3te
yst4r
y3su
y3sv
y3sy
y3s??
y3s??
y3s??
yt4me
yu3??
y3vs
yv??4t
y3zb
y3zd
y3zk
y3zn
yz4n??
yz4n??
y3zp
yz4po
y??2k
y2??
y??3b
y??k4n
y??4??e
y3????
y2??
y3??e
y3??i
y3??k
y??1l
y3??o
y3??p
y3??u
y3????
y??2
y3??d
1z
2z.
zab2l
za4bs
za4dk
za3dl
za4dn
za3h
za3i
za3j
za4jk
za3k
za4kt
zal4k
zam4n
za3p2
za3s2
zat2
za3tl
zat4r
za4ut
za3z
zaz4n
za4z??
za4??.
za3??
za??4k
za4??s
2zb
zban4
z2by
zbys4
2z1c
2z2d
z3di
zdn??4n??
z4doba
z4dobn??
zd4re
zd4v??
z2e
ze3h
ze3p2
4zerot
ze3s2
zes4p
zet2
zev2
ze3vn
ze3z
ze4z.
2z2f
z1h??
z4ine
z2j
z3j??
2z2k
z3ka.
z3ky
z3k??
z3k??
z3k??
2zl
3zl.
zlhos4
zlik3
z3ly.
z2m2
2zme
z3mn
z3my
z4m??n
2z2n
3znak
z4nal
z3ne.
z3nic
z3no
z3nu
z3ny
z3n??
z3n??
z4n??l
z3n??
z4n??t
z4n??v
z3n??
zo4tr
zo4??k
2z2p
z3pt
z4p??t
3zrak
2z1s2
2zt
ztros3
z4tr??
z3t??
3zu.
zu3mo
zu3m??
zu3m??
zu3??
z2v
zva4d
z3va??
z3vi
zvik4
zv4n??
z3vod
z3voj
z4von
zv4ro
z4v??n
z4v??s
z3v??j
3zy.
2zz
z??1
z??h2
z??4kl.
3z??p
z??3s2
z??3z
z????2
2z??
z3??l
2z??
z2??
z??ej3
z3??ez
z3??e??
2z??2
z3??k
z??4ka
z3??t
2z2??1
z??3??
z??3??
z??3s
??1b
??2bl
??b4ry
??4b??.
??3cho
??c3ti3
??1d
??2dl
??do4s
??dos4ti
??d1??
??1ha
??3he
??h1l
??3hl.
??h3n
??1ho
??1hr
??1h??
??1j
??4jmu
??j4m??
??4kli
??k4ni
??1la
??1le
??1lo
??1lu
??1ly
??3l??
??1l??
??3my
??3m??
??1m??
??3m??
??3m??
??ne4v
??1ra
??1re
??r2m
??1ro
??1ru
??3r??
??1s
??2sc
??2s3k
??s4k.
??s4kl
??s4kn
??2sla
??s4ly
??2sm
??s4po
??2st
??t3k
??t1r
??1tu
??1ty
??1t??
??3t??
??v4si
??v4s??
??z3k
??z3ni
??zni4c
??z4vi
??2??
??1??
????4ke
????4k??
??2??
??3??e
??3????
2??.
1??a
??a4br
2??b
2??1c
1??e
3??e.
??e1c
??es3k
1??i
2??k
??3ka.
??3ko
??3ku
??3ky
2??1m
2??n
??2ne
1??o
??2p
2??s
??1sk
??s4la
??s4sr
2??2t
??4ten??.
??4ten??
??t4la
??4tov??.
3??tv
4??t??n
??3t??
1??u
1????
1????
????s3l
1????
2??.
1??a
1??o
??s4te
2??1t
3??uj
??1
??2d
??3di
??3do
??2f
??3fo
??f1r
??2kl
??2l
??2m
??3ma
??3me
??3mi
??3mo
??3mu
??3m??
4??re.
??2s
??2t
??3ta
??3to
??3t??
??2??
??2??
??1c
??d3r
??3ha
??3he
??3hl.
??h3lo
??h3n
??1ho
??3hu
??3h??
??3ja
??1je
??1jo
??3j??
??4kl??
??3k2t
??1l
??1ra
??ra3d
??1re
??1ro
??r3s
??rs4t
??1ru
??1ry
??1r??
??s3k
??s3n
??t1a3
??t4ac
??t1l
??1tr
??t3ra
??4traj
??t3v
??1t??
??t3????
??2v
??3va
??3ve
??3vl
??3vo
??3vu
??3v??
??v3??
??2z
??3ze
??3zi
??z3n
??3zo
??3z??
??1??
??2??
??3??e
??3??i
??3??o
??3??u
??3????
??3????
????3??
????4??s
??2??
??3??o
??2??
??3??e
??3??i
??3??o
??3??u
??3????
??1b
??b3??
??3cho
??ch4t
??d1l
??1h
??2hl
??h3n
??1j
??jed4
??j4m??
??2kr
??1l
??1m??
??3m??
??1m??
??1r
??1sa
??2s3k
??s4kl
??s4kn
??s4l.
??s3le
??s4ln
??s??h2
??1t
??t3k
??3t3??e
??z3da
??z3de
??z3k
??3zna
??3z3ni
??3zn??n
??2??
??1??
??2??
??3??e
??3??i
??3??o
??3????
1??
2??.
2??a
??a3d
2??k
2??m
3??ov
??1s
2??1t
??1
??2z
??3za
??3zi
??3zo
??3zy
2??.
??a4pl
??a4??m
2??2b
2??c
2??d
??e3ch
??e4dob
??e1h
??e3jd
??e3kl
??e3kv
??e4k????
??eo4r
??e3p2
??e4p.
??e4pk
??e4p??
??er4v
2??es
??e3ska
??e3sko
??e2sp
??es3po
??e4sr
??e3sta
??e3stu
??e3st??
??e3st??
??e3tl
??et4??
??e3zd
??e3zk
4??ezl
??e3??t
??i1
??ia3
??i3h
??i4h.
??i4hn
??i4j??
??i4l.
??i4lb
??il2n
4??ine
??is2
3??i4t.
??i4v.
??i4vk
??i4vn
??i3z
??i??4t
??i3??
??i4??.
2??k
??2kl
??k4la
??k4li
??k4ly
??k4no
2??1l
2??1m
2??n
1??o
2??ou
2??2p
2??1s
??s4to
2??1t
??2v
2??z
????4pl
????2sl
2??1??
2????d
????4k??
????1s
2????
??3??t
????4ti
1??
2??.
??ab3
??a4vl
2??1c
??ej4d
??ep3t
??i4mr
2??2k
??3ka
??3ke
??3k3li
4??3kou
4??kov
3??kr
??k4ro
??3ku.
??3ky
2??l
??2la
??2li
??3liv
??2lo
??l??2
??2l??
??2l??
2??1m
??mi4d
2??n
??2p
2??1s
2??t
??4tip
??t4ka
??t4kl
??4t??k
??2t??s
??4t??v
??4t??p
??2v
????3d
??2??
??3????
2??2??
??3??o
??3??u
??3????
1??
2??.
3??al
2??k
2??m
2??t
??????4k
1??
??2c2
??2d
??j4ma
??2k
??2l
??2n
??2p
??2t
??t4ko
??2v
??2z
??z3k
??2??
3????e
????e4z
????4ti
??2??
??1b
??1c
??1hl
??3jd
??4jmov??
??1le
??1my
??1m??
??1ra
??r4va
??r4vy
??1s2
??2st
??s3te
??s3t??n
??t2
??3tkl
??2v
??3va
??3vo
??3v??
??2z
??3zo
??2??
??3??e
??3??i
??3??o
??1b
??3cho
??1d
??d4la
??1h
??1j
??1l
??1ml
??1m??
??2n
??3no
??po3??4
??1r
??1s2
??2sk
??1t
??t4ku
??t4ky
??1u
??4vli
??3zk
??3zn
??4zvu
????4n??
??1??
????3l
1??
2??.
??a3d
??a4tv
3??a??
2??1b
2??1c
2??1d
??e2b3
??eh3n
??e4ml
??e4zg
??i4dl
??i4jm
3??il
??i2vl
2??k
??k4ni
2??l
??4lic
3??lo
2??1m
2??n
??on2
2??1s2
2??1t
??2v
????4br
????4nr
2????
????4zn
2????
2????
????4ti
????4t??
